Washington statutes.
RCW 35.74.020

Initiation of proceedings—Notice to county commissioners.

If the city or town council desires to erect a drawbridge across any navigable stream on any street, or to grant the privilege so to do to any corporation or individual, it shall notify the board of county commissioners to that effect stating the precise point where such bridge is proposed to be located.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.74.020. Prior: 1890 p 54 s 2, part; RRS s 9324, part.]